Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-161
Sections; purpose.

The purpose of sections 20-161 to 20-166 is to protect the legal and human rights of persons with developmental disabilities or mentally ill individuals by providing access to certain records of a person with developmental disabilities or of a mentally ill individual by the officially designated protection and advocacy system for the developmentally disabled and mentally ill in this state.

Laws 1988, LB 697, § 1.